Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Penalties

171.990.
Penalties.

Any person or library board violating any of the provisions of KRS

171.240

to

171.300

shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

The board for certification of librarians may revoke the certificate of any person violating any of the provisions of KRS

171.240

to

171.300

, or any of the regulations as established by the board for certification.

Any person knowingly violating the rules and regulations of the department pursuant to the provisions of KRS

171.450

,

171.560

,

171.670

,

171.710

, or

171.720

is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and is also liable for damages or losses incurred by the Commonwealth. Any state employee who knowingly violates these provisions shall also be subject to dismissal from state employment upon a determination of fact, at a hearing, that a serious violation did occur. The employee’s right to appeal to the state personnel board is not abridged or denied. In the event of an appeal, the decision of the state personnel board is final.

State employees dismissed under the provision of subsection (3) of this section shall have the right to reapply for state employment in accordance with state personnel rules governing dismissal. Such individuals shall have the full rights and privileges accorded under applicable equal opportunity laws.

History.

4618-130i, 4618-130k; amend. Acts 1972, ch. 223, § 5; 1982, ch. 245, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.